Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 27 Mortgage Foreclosure and Sale

34-27-1.
Complaint to foreclose.

Any person entitled to foreclose the equity of redemption in any mortgaged estate, whether real or personal, may prefer a complaint to foreclose it, which complaint may be heard, tried, and determined according to the usages in chancery and the principles of equity.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

34-27-1

.

34-27-1.1.
[Transferred.]

34-27-2.
Right of mortgagee to bid at sale.

At any sale by public auction made under and according to the provisions of any mortgage of real estate, or of any power of sale contained therein or annexed thereto, the mortgagee in the deed of mortgage or other conveyance, or pledgee, his, her, or their assigns, or his, her, or their heirs, executors or administrators, or any person for him, her, or them, may fairly and in good faith bid for and purchase the estate or property so put up for sale, or any part thereof, in the same manner as it may be bid for and purchased by any other person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 16; P.L. 1896, ch. 327, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

34-27-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3.

34-27-3.
Discharge of purchaser at sale by payments to mortgagee.

The receipt in writing of a mortgagee shall be a sufficient discharge for any money accruing from sales made under the powers of sale conferred by his or her mortgage; and a person paying it to the mortgagee shall not be obliged to inquire whether any money remains due under the mortgage, or to see as to the application of such proceeds in case of sale.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 207, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 258, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

34-27-3

.

34-27-3.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 384, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2014, ch. 543, § 2, effective October 8, 2014.

34-27-3.2.
Mediation conference.

Statement of policy. It is hereby declared that residential mortgage foreclosure actions, caused in part by unemployment and underemployment, have negatively impacted a substantial number of homeowners throughout the state, creating a situation that endangers the economic stability of many of the citizens of this state as the increasing numbers of foreclosures lead to increases in unoccupied and unattended buildings and the unwanted displacement of homeowners and tenants who desire to live and work within the state.

Purpose. The statutory framework for foreclosure proceedings is prescribed under the provisions of chapter 27 of this title. As the need for a mortgage mediation process has evolved, it is important for the state to develop a standardized, statewide process for foreclosure mediation rather than a process based on local ordinances that may vary from municipality to municipality. By providing a uniform standard for an early HUD-approved, independent counseling process in owner-occupied principal residence mortgage foreclosure cases, the chances of achieving a positive outcome for homeowners and lenders will be enhanced.

Definitions. The following definitions apply in the interpretations of the provisions of this section unless the context requires another meaning:

“Default” means the failure of the mortgagor to make a timely payment of an amount due under the terms of the mortgage contract, which failure has not been subsequently cured.

“Department” means the department of business regulation.

“Good faith” means that the mortgagor and mortgagee deal honestly and fairly with the mediation coordinator with an intent to determine whether an alternative to foreclosure is economically feasible for the mortgagor and mortgagee, as evidenced by some or all of the following factors:

Mortgagee provided notice as required by this section;

Mortgagee designated an agent to participate in the mediation conference on its behalf and with the authority to agree to a work-out agreement on its behalf;

Mortgagee made reasonable efforts to respond in a timely manner to requests for information from the mediation coordinator, mortgagor, or counselor assisting the mortgagor;

Mortgagee declined to accept the mortgagor’s work-out proposal, if any, and the mortgagee provided a detailed statement, in writing, of its reasons for rejecting the proposal;

Where a mortgagee declined to accept the mortgagor’s work-out proposal, the mortgagee offered, in writing, to enter into an alternative work-out/disposition resolution proposal that would result in net financial benefit to the mortgagor as compared to the terms of the mortgage.

“HUD” means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and any successor to such department.

“Mediation conference” means a conference involving the mortgagee and mortgagor, coordinated and facilitated by a mediation coordinator whose purpose is to determine whether an alternative to foreclosure is economically feasible to both the mortgagee and the mortgagor, and if it is determined that an alternative to foreclosure is economically feasible, to facilitate a loan workout or other solution in an effort to avoid foreclosure.

“Mediation coordinator” means a person employed by a Rhode Island-based, HUD-approved counseling agency designated to serve as the unbiased, impartial, and independent coordinator and facilitator of the mediation conference, with no authority to impose a solution or otherwise act as a consumer advocate, provided that such person possesses the experience and qualifications established by the department.

“Mortgage” means an individual consumer first-lien mortgage on any owner-occupied, one (1)- to four (4)- unit residential property that serves as the mortgagor’s primary residence.

“Mortgagee” means the holder of a mortgage, or its agent or employee, including a mortgage servicer acting on behalf of a mortgagee.

“Mortgagor” means the person who has signed a mortgage in order to secure a debt or other duty, or the heir or devisee of such person provided that:

The heir or devisee occupies the property as his or her primary residence; and

The heir or devisee has record title to the property, or a representative of the estate of the mortgagor has been appointed with authority to participate in a mediation conference.

The mortgagee shall, prior to initiation of foreclosure of real estate pursuant to §

34-27-4(b)

, provide to the mortgagor written notice at the address of the real estate and, if different, at the address designated by the mortgagor by written notice to the mortgagee as the mortgagor’s address for receipt of notices, that the mortgagee may not foreclose on the mortgaged property without first participating in a mediation conference. Notice addressed and delivered as provided in this section shall be effective with respect to the mortgagor and any heir or devisee of the mortgagor.

If the mortgagee fails to mail the notice required by this subsection to the mortgagor within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of default, it shall pay a penalty at the rate of one thousand ($1,000) per month for each month or part thereof, with the first month commencing on the one hundred twenty-first (121st) day after the date of default and a new month commencing on the same day (or if there is no such day, then on the last day) of each succeeding calendar month until the mortgagee sends the mortgagor written notice as required by this section.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, any penalties assessed under this subsection for any failure of any mortgagee to provide notice as provided herein during the period from September 13, 2013, through the effective date of this section shall not exceed the total amount of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) for such mortgagee.

Penalties accruing pursuant to subsection (d)(1) shall be paid to the mediation coordinator prior to the completion of the mediation process. All penalties accrued under this section shall be transferred to the state within one month of receipt by the mediation coordinator and deposited to the restricted-receipt account within the general fund established by §

42-128-2(3)

and used for the purposes set forth therein.

Issuance by the mediation coordinator of a certificate authorizing the mortgagee to proceed to foreclosure, or otherwise certifying the mortgagee’s good-faith effort to comply with the provisions of this section, shall constitute conclusive evidence that, to the extent that any penalty may have accrued pursuant to subsection (d)(1), the penalty has been paid in full by the mortgagee.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection, a mortgagee shall not accrue any penalty if the notice required by this subsection is mailed to the borrower:

Within sixty (60) days after the date upon which the loan is released from the protection of the automatic stay in a bankruptcy proceeding, or any similar injunctive order issued by a state or federal court, or within sixty (60) days after a loan is no longer afforded protection under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.) or the provisions of §

34-27-4(d)

, or within one hundred twenty (120) days of the date on which the mortgagor initially failed to comply with the terms of an eligible workout agreement, as hereinafter defined; and

The mortgagee otherwise complies with the requirements of subsection (d); provided, however, that if the mortgagee fails to mail the notice required by subsection (d) to the mortgagor within the time frame set forth in subsection (d)(4)(i), the mortgagee shall pay a penalty at the rate of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month for each month, or part thereof, with the first month commencing on the thirty-first (31st) day after the date upon which the loan is released from the protection of the automatic stay in a bankruptcy proceeding or any similar injunctive order issued by a state or federal court and a new month commencing on the same day (or if there is no such day, then on the last day) of each succeeding calendar month until the mortgagee sends the mortgagor written notice as required by this section. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any penalties assessed under this subsection for any failure of any mortgagee to provide notice as provided herein during the period from September 13, 2013, through the effective date of this section shall not exceed the total amount of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) for such mortgagee.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a mortgagee may initiate a judicial foreclosure in accordance with §

34-27-1

.

A form of written notice meeting the requirements of this section shall be promulgated by the department for use by mortgagees at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of this section. The written notice required by this section shall be in English, Portuguese, and Spanish and may be combined with any other notice required under this chapter or pursuant to state or federal law.

The mediation conference shall take place in person, or over the phone, at a time and place deemed mutually convenient for the parties by an individual employed by a HUD-approved, independent counseling agency selected by the mortgagee to serve as a mediation coordinator, but not later than sixty (60) days following the mailing of the notice. The mortgagor shall cooperate in all respects with the mediation coordinator including, but not limited to, providing all necessary financial and employment information and completing any and all loan resolution proposals and applications deemed appropriate by the mediation coordinator. A mediation conference between the mortgagor and mortgagee conducted by a mediation coordinator shall be provided at no cost to the mortgagor. The HUD-approved counseling agency shall be compensated by the mortgagee for mediation conferences that take place at a rate not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per mediation. The HUD-approved agency shall be entitled to a filing fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per mediation engagement.

If, after two (2) attempts by the mediation coordinator to contact the mortgagor, the mortgagor fails to respond to the mediation coordinator’s request to appear at a mediation conference, or the mortgagor fails to cooperate in any respect with the requirements of this section, the requirements of the section shall be deemed satisfied upon verification by the mediation coordinator that the required notice was sent and any penalties accrued pursuant to subsection (d)(1) and any payments owed pursuant to subsection (f) have been paid. Upon verification, a certificate will be issued immediately by the mediation coordinator authorizing the mortgagee to proceed with the foreclosure action, including recording the deed. Such certificate shall be valid until the earlier of:

The curing of the default condition; or

The foreclosure of the mortgagor’s right of redemption.

The certificate shall be recorded along with the foreclosure deed. A form of certificate meeting the requirements of this section shall be promulgated by the department for use by mortgagees at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of this section.

If the mediation coordinator determines that after a good-faith effort made by the mortgagee at the mediation conference, the parties cannot come to an agreement to renegotiate the terms of the loan in an effort to avoid foreclosure, such good-faith effort by the mortgagee shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this section. A certificate certifying such good-faith effort will be promptly issued by the mediation coordinator authorizing the mortgagee to proceed with the foreclosure action and recording of the foreclosure deed; provided, however, that the mediation coordinator shall not be required to issue such a certificate until any penalties accrued pursuant to subsections (d)(1) and (d)(4)(ii), and any payments owed pursuant to subsection (f), have been paid. Such certification shall be valid until the earlier of:

The curing of the default condition; or

The foreclosure of the mortgagor’s equity of redemption.

The certificate shall be recorded along with the foreclosure deed. A form of certificate meeting the requirements of this section shall be promulgated by the department for use by mortgagees at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of this section.

If the mortgagee and mortgagor are able to reach agreement to renegotiate the terms of the loan to avoid foreclosure, the agreement shall be reduced to writing and executed by the mortgagor and mortgagee. If the mortgagee and mortgagor reach agreement after the notice of mediation conference is sent to the mortgagor, but without the assistance of the mediation coordinator, the mortgagee shall provide a copy of the written agreement to the mediation coordinator. Upon receipt of a written agreement between the mortgagee and mortgagor, the mediation coordinator shall issue a certificate of eligible workout agreement if the workout agreement would result in a net financial benefit to the mortgagor as compared to the terms of the mortgage (“Certificate of Eligible Workout Agreement”). For purposes of this subsection, evidence of an agreement shall include, but not be limited to, evidence of agreement by both mortgagee and mortgagor to the terms of a short sale or a deed in lieu of foreclosure, regardless of whether said short sale or deed in lieu of foreclosure is subsequently completed.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, where a mortgagor and mortgagee have entered into a written agreement and the mediation coordinator has issued a certificate of eligible workout agreement as provided in subsection (i), if the mortgagor fails to fulfill his or her obligations under the eligible workout agreement, the provisions of this section shall not apply to any foreclosure initiated under this chapter within twelve (12) months following the date of the eligible workout agreement. In such case, the mortgagee shall include in the foreclosure deed an affidavit establishing its right to proceed under this section.

This section shall apply only to foreclosure of mortgages on owner-occupied, residential real property with no more than four (4) dwelling units that is the primary dwelling of the mortgagor and not to mortgages secured by other real property.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, any locally based mortgagees shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section if:

The mortgagee is headquartered in Rhode Island; or

The mortgagee maintains a physical office, or offices, exclusively in Rhode Island from which office, or offices, it carries out full-service mortgage operations, including the acceptance and processing of mortgage payments and the provision of local customer service and loss mitigation and where Rhode Island staff have the authority to approve loan restructuring and other loss mitigation strategies; and

The deed offered by a mortgagee to be filed with the city or town recorder of deeds as a result of a mortgage foreclosure action under power of sale contained a certification that the provisions of this section have been satisfied.

No deed offered by a mortgagee as a result of a mortgage foreclosure action under power of sale shall be submitted to a city or town recorder of deeds for recording in the land evidence records of the city or town until and unless the requirements of this section are met. Failure of the mortgagee to comply with the requirements of this section shall render the foreclosure voidable, without limitation of the right of the mortgagee thereafter to re-exercise its power of sale or other means of foreclosure upon compliance with this section. The rights of the mortgagor to any redress afforded under the law are not abridged by this section.

Any existing municipal ordinance or future ordinance that requires a conciliation or mediation process as a precondition to the recordation of a foreclosure deed shall comply with the provisions set forth herein and any provisions of said ordinances that do not comply with the provisions set forth herein shall be determined to be unenforceable.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if:

The mortgage is a reverse mortgage as described in chapter 25.1 of this title; or

The date of default under the mortgage is on or before May 16, 2013.

Limitations on actions. Any person who claims that a foreclosure is not valid due to the mortgagee’s failure to comply with the terms of this section shall have one year from the date that the first notice of foreclosure was published to file a complaint in the superior court for the county in which the property is located and shall also file in the records of land evidence in the city or town where the land subject to the mortgage is located a notice of lis pendens, the complaint to be filed on the same day as the notice of lis pendens or within seven (7) days thereafter. Failure to file a complaint, record the notice of lis pendens, and serve the mortgagee within the one-year period shall preclude said mortgagor, or any other person claiming an interest through a mortgagor, from subsequently challenging the validity of the foreclosure. Issuance by the mediation coordinator of a certificate authorizing the mortgagee to proceed to foreclosure, or otherwise certifying the mortgagee’s good-faith effort to comply with the provisions of this section, shall constitute a rebuttable presumption that the notice requirements of subsection (d) have been met in all respects.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 406, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 543, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 72, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 73, § 3.

34-27-4.
Publication of notice under power of sale and rights of active military servicemembers.

Whenever any real estate shall be sold under any power of sale mortgage executed subsequent to May 4, 1911, and the mortgage shall provide for the giving of notice of the sale by publication in some public newspaper at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks before the sale, the first publication of the notice shall be at least twenty-one (21) days before the day of sale, including the day of the first publication in the computation, and the third publication of the notice shall be no fewer than seven (7) days before the original date of sale listed in the advertisement, including the day of the third publication in the computation, and no more than fourteen (14) days before the original date of sale listed in the advertisement. The sale may take place no more than fourteen (14) days from the date on which the third successive notice is published, excluding the day of the third publication in the computation. Provided, however, that if the sale is adjourned as provided in §

34-11-22

, and the adjourned sale is held during the same calendar week as the originally scheduled day of sale, no additional advertising is required. Otherwise, publication of the notice of the adjourned sale, together with a notice of the adjournment or adjournments, shall be continued at least once each week commencing with the calendar week following the originally scheduled day of sale; the sale, as so adjourned, shall take place during the same calendar week in which the last notice of the adjourned sale is published, at least one day after the date on which the last notice is published.

Provided, however, that no notice shall be valid or effective unless the mortgagor has been mailed written notice of the time and place of sale by certified mail return receipt requested at the address of the real estate and, if different, at the mortgagor’s address listed with the tax assessor’s office of the city or town where the real estate is located or any other address mortgagor designates by written notice to mortgagee at his, her, or its last known address, at least twenty (20) days for mortgagors other than individual consumer mortgagors, and at least thirty (30) days for individual consumer mortgagors, days prior to the first publication, including the day of mailing in the computation. The mortgagee shall include in the foreclosure deed an affidavit of compliance with this provision.

Provided further, that the notice mailed to the mortgagor in accordance with subsection (b) above shall also contain a copy of subsection (d) below (printed in not less than 12 point type) headed by the following notice (printed in not less than 14 point type): “A servicemember on active duty or deployment or who has recently ceased such duty or deployment has certain rights under subsection

34-27-4(d)

of the Rhode Island general laws set out below. To protect your rights if you are such a servicemember, you should give written notice to the servicer of the obligation or the attorney conducting the foreclosure, prior to the sale, that you are a servicemember on active duty or deployment or who has recently ceased such duty or deployment. This notice may be given on your behalf by your authorized representative. If you have any questions about this notice, you should consult with an attorney.” The mortgagee shall include in the foreclosure deed an affidavit of compliance with this provision.

Foreclosure sales affecting servicemembers.

The following definitions shall apply to this subsection and to subsection (c):

“Servicemember” means a member of the army, navy, air force, marine corps, or coast guard and members of the national guard or reserves called to active duty.

“Active duty” has the same meaning as the term is defined in 10 U.S.C. §§ 12301 — 12304. In the case of a member of the national guard, or reserves “active duty” means and includes service under a call to active service authorized by the president or the secretary of defense for a period of time of more than thirty (30) consecutive days under 32 U.S.C. § 502(f), for the purposes of responding to a national emergency declared by the president and supported by federal funds.

This subsection applies only to an obligation on real and related personal property owned by a service member that:

Originated before the period of the servicemember’s military service or in the case of a member of the national guard or reserves originated before being called into active duty and for which the servicemember is still obligated; and

Is secured by a mortgage or other security in the nature of a mortgage.

Stay of right to foreclose by mortgagee. Upon receipt of written notice from the mortgagor or mortgagor’s authorized representative that the mortgagor is participating in active duty or deployment or that the notice as provided in subsection (c) was received within nine (9) months of completion of active duty or deployment, the mortgagee shall be barred from proceeding with the execution of sale of the property as defined in the notice until such nine (9) month period has lapsed or until the mortgagee obtains court approval in accordance with subdivision (d)(5) below.

Stay of proceedings and adjustment of obligation. In the event a mortgagee proceeds with foreclosure of the property during, or within nine (9) months after a servicemember’s period of active duty or deployment notwithstanding receipt of notice contemplated by subdivision (d)(3) above, the servicemember or his or her authorized representative may file a petition against the mortgagee seeking a stay of such foreclosure, after a hearing on such petition, and on its own motion, the court may:

Stay the proceedings for a period of time as justice and equity require; or

Adjust the obligation as permitted by federal law to preserve the interests of all parties.

Sale or foreclosure. A sale, foreclosure or seizure of property for a breach of an obligation of a servicemember who is entitled to the benefits under subsection (d) and who provided the mortgagee with written notice permitted under subdivision (d)(3) shall not be valid if made during, or within nine (9) months after, the period of the servicemember’s military service except:

Upon a court order granted before such sale, foreclosure or seizure after hearing on a petition filed by the mortgagee against such servicemember; or

If made pursuant to an agreement of all parties.

Penalties. A mortgagee who knowingly makes or causes to be made a sale, foreclosure or seizure of property that is prohibited by subsection (d)(3) shall be fined the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both. The remedies and rights provided hereunder are in addition to and do not preclude any remedy for wrongful conversion otherwise available under law to the person claiming relief under this section, including consequential and punitive damages.

Any petition hereunder shall be commenced by action filed in the superior court for the county in which the property subject to the mortgage or other security in the nature of a mortgage is situated. Any hearing on such petition shall be conducted on an expedited basis following such notice and/or discovery as the court deems proper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1911, ch. 692, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 302, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 442, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

34-27-4

; P.L. 1988, ch. 138, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 154, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 224, § 3; P.L. 1993, ch. 377, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 233, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 358, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 177, § 1.

34-27-5.
Mortgage foreclosure advertisement.

An advertisement for foreclosure may, if describing the real estate being foreclosed, describe the real estate to be foreclosed by metes and bounds description and street address, or by recitation of the taxing authority’s assessor’s plat and lot designation and street address, or by recitation of the book and page of mortgage and street address.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 403, § 1.

34-27-6.
Payment of outstanding taxes.

In connection with any sale by public auction made under and according to the provisions of any mortgage of real estate or any power of sale contained therein or annexed thereto, if the mortgagee or an affiliate of the mortgagee is the successful bidder for the real estate or property offered for sale, the foreclosure deed shall be recorded in the records of land evidence for the municipality where the real estate is located within forty-five (45) days after the date of the sale. The deed shall be captioned “foreclosure deed” and the date of the foreclosure shall be stated in the deed. This subsection (a) shall not apply to any such sale if, prior to the recording of the foreclosure deed: (1) The mortgagor files a voluntary proceeding, or an order for relief is entered in any involuntary proceeding against the mortgagor, under any federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency statute; or (2) The mortgagee abandons or otherwise terminates such sale.

Notwithstanding any other general law or local ordinance to the contrary, the grantee of real estate named in the foreclosure deed shall pay to the municipality, on or before the date the foreclosure deed is recorded, all taxes and other assessments, including water charges, interest and penalties, if any, that constitute liens on the real estate described in the foreclosure deed and that are due and owing on the recording date (collectively, “taxes due and owing”); provided, however, that a grantee shall not be deemed in violation of this subsection (b) if the grantee shall apply for a municipal lien certificate from the tax collector for the municipality during the forty-five-day (45) period ending on the day on which the foreclosure deed is recorded and shall pay the taxes due and owing within thirty (30) days after the date on which the municipal lien certificate is mailed by the tax collector by the United States mail, postage prepaid, certified, return receipt requested, and addressed to the grantee at the address therefor set forth in the application for the municipal lien certificate. Taxes due and owing for purposes of this section shall include only installments thereof required by law to be paid as of the date the foreclosure deed is recorded.

Upon a violation of any one or more of the requirements of this section, a penalty shall accrue at the rate of three hundred dollars ($300) per month (in the aggregate) for each month or part thereof during which such violation or violations continue. For purposes of determining the penalty due hereunder, a month commences on the day on which the first such violation occurs and a new month commences on the same day (or if there is no such day, then on the last day) of each succeeding calendar month until all taxes due and owing are paid. In the event of a violation of subsection (a), taxes due and owing shall be determined as of the date required thereunder for the recording of a foreclosure deed. The maximum aggregate penalty shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), which shall be paid prior to the city or town clerk accepting the foreclosure deed for recording.

As used in this section, the term “affiliate” shall mean, with respect to any mortgagee, any individual or legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such mortgagee, and the term “foreclosure deed” shall mean the mortgagee’s deed or other conveyance of title to the successful bidder at any sale by public auction made under and according to the provisions of any mortgage of real estate or any power of sale contained therein or annexed thereto.

A mortgagee not licensed as a financial lending institution holding a mortgage by private agreement with another party shall be exempt from the penalty requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 173, § 1.

34-27-7.
Notice to tenants of foreclosure sale.

The mortgagee shall provide to each bona fide tenant a written notice: (1) Stating that the real estate is scheduled to be sold at foreclosure; (2) Stating the date, time, and place initially scheduled for the sale; (3) Informing of the availability and advisability of counseling and information services; (4) Providing the address and telephone number of the Rhode Island housing help center and the United Way

2-1-1

center; (5) Reminding the recipient to continue paying rent to the landlord until the foreclosure sale occurs; and (6) Stating that this notice is not an eviction notice. The notice shall be mailed by first-class mail at least one business day prior to the first publication of the notice required by §

34-27-4

. A form of written notice meeting the requirements of this section shall be promulgated by the department of business regulation for use by mortgagees no later than sixty (60) days after the effective date of this section. The notice may be addressed to “Occupant” and mailed to each dwelling unit of the real estate identified in the application for the loan secured by the mortgage being foreclosed. Failure of the mortgagee to provide notice as provided herein shall not affect the validity of the foreclosure.

For purposes of this section, a lease or tenancy shall be considered bona fide only if:

The mortgagor, or the child, spouse, or parent of the mortgagor, under the contract is not the tenant;

The lease or tenancy was the result of an arms-length transaction; and

The lease or tenancy requires the receipt of rent that is not substantially less than fair-market rent for the property or the unit’s rent is reduced or subsidized due to a federal, state, or local subsidy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 486, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 513, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 23.

34-27-8.
Requirement of affidavit from certain tax-exempt entities.

Definitions. The following definitions apply in the interpretation of the provisions of this section unless the context requires another meaning:

“Mortgage loan” means a loan to a natural person made primarily for personal, family, or household purposes secured wholly or partially by a mortgage on residential property.

“Residential property” means real property on which there is a dwelling house with accommodations for no more than four (4) dwelling units and occupied, or to be occupied, in whole or in part, by the obligor of the mortgage debt; provided, however, that residential property shall be limited to the principal residence of a person; provided, further, that residential property shall not include an investment property or residence other than a primary residence; and provided, further, that residential property shall not include residential property taken in whole or in part as collateral for a commercial loan.

In all circumstances in which an offer to purchase either a mortgage loan or residential property is made by an entity with a tax-exempt filing status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or an entity controlled by an entity with such tax-exempt filing status, no mortgagee shall require, as a condition of sale or transfer to any such entity, any affidavit, statement, agreement, or addendum limiting ownership or occupancy of the residential property in question and, if obtained, such affidavit, statement, agreement, or addendum shall not provide a basis to avoid a sale or transfer, nor shall it be enforceable against such acquiring entity or any real estate broker, mortgagor, or settlement agent named in such affidavit, statement, or addendum.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 359, § 1.